Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 47 Weapons
11-47-9.
Persons exempt from restrictions.

The provisions of §

11-47-8

shall not apply to sheriffs; deputy sheriffs; the superintendent and members of the state police; members of the Rhode Island airport police department; members of the Rhode Island state marshals; Rhode Island state fire marshal; chief deputy state fire marshals; deputy state fire marshals assigned to the bomb squad, and those assigned to the investigation unit; Providence fire department arson investigators, provided that the investigator receiving the permit is a graduate of a police-training academy; correctional officers, chief inspector and inspectors within the office of inspections, within the department of corrections; members of the city or town police force; capitol police investigators of the department of attorney general appointed pursuant to §

42-9-8.1

; the witness protection coordinator for the witness protection review board as set forth in chapter 30 of title 12 and subject to the minimum qualifications of §

42-9-8.1

; automobile theft investigators of the Rhode Island state police pursuant to §

31-50-1

; railroad police while traveling to and from official assignments or while on assignments; conservation officers; or other duly appointed law enforcement officers; nor to members of the Army, Navy, Air Force, and Marine Corps of the United States, the National Guard, or organized reserves, when on duty; nor to members of organizations by law authorized to purchase or receive firearms from the United States or this state, provided these members are at, or going to or from, their places of assembly or target practice; nor to officers or employees of the United States authorized by law to carry a concealed firearm; nor to any civilian guard or criminal investigator carrying sidearms or a concealed firearm in the performance of his or her official duties under the authority of the commanding officer of the military establishment in the state of Rhode Island where he or she is employed by the United States; nor to any civilian guard carrying sidearms or a concealed firearm in the performance of his or her official duties under the authority of the adjutant general where he or she is employed guarding a national guard facility, provided, that the commanding officer of the military establishment shall have on file with the attorney general of this state a list of the names and addresses of all civilian guards and criminal investigators so authorized; nor to duly authorized military organizations when on duty; nor to members when at, or going to or from, their customary places of assembly; nor to any individual employed in the capacity of warden, associate warden, major, captain, lieutenant, sergeant, correctional officer or investigator at any project owned or operated by a municipal detention facility corporation, including the Donald W. Wyatt Detention Facility; nor to the regular and/or ordinary transportation of pistols or revolvers as merchandise; nor to any person while transporting a pistol, or revolvers, unloaded from the place of purchase to their residence, or place of business, from their residence to their place of business or from their place of business to their residence, or to a federal firearms licensee for the purpose of sale, to or from a bona fide gunsmith, or firearms repair facility, to any police station or other location designated as a site of a bona fide “gun buy-back” program, but only if said pistol or revolver is unloaded and any ammunition for said pistol or revolver is not readily or directly accessible from the passenger compartment of such vehicle while transporting same and further provided, that in the case of a vehicle without a compartment separate from the passenger compartment, the firearm or the ammunition shall be stored in a locked container.

Persons exempted by the provisions of this section from the provisions of §

11-47-8

shall have the right to carry concealed firearms everywhere within this state; provided, that this shall not be construed as giving the right to carry concealed firearms to a person transporting firearms as merchandise or as household or business goods.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 1052, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 404, § 5; P.L. 1953, ch. 3135, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-6

; G.L., §

11-47-9

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 134, § 2; P.L. 1974, ch. 252, § 2; P.L. 1975, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 371, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 208, § 5; P.L. 1992, ch. 286, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 423, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 412, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 329, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 390, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 263, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 392, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 503, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 520, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 94, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 156, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 475, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 7, § 4; P.L. 2013, ch. 164, § 4; P.L. 2013, ch. 234, § 4; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 492, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 525, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 378, § 1, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 379, § 1, effective June 29, 2022.

11-47-9.1.
Additional exemptions.

The provisions of §§

11-47-8

and

11-47-11

shall not apply to members of the state police, members of city or town police forces, and members of the Rhode Island airport police department. Persons exempted by the provisions of this section from the provisions of §

11-47-8

shall have the right to carry concealed firearms everywhere within this state; provided, that this shall not be construed as giving the right to carry concealed firearms to a person transporting firearms as merchandise or as household or business goods.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 379, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 412, § 1.

11-47-10.
License or permit not required to carry to target range.

No license or permit shall be required for the purpose of carrying or transporting any pistol or revolver from one’s home or place of business to a bona fide target practice range, nor from a bona fide target practice range to one’s home or place of business, to engage in any shoot meet, or practice, provided that the pistol or revolver is broken down, unloaded and carried as openly as circumstances will permit, or provided that the pistols or revolvers are unloaded and secured in a separate container suitable for the purpose.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 404, § 5(a); P.L. 1954, ch. 3322, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-7

; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-10

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 278, § 1.

11-47-11.
License or permit to carry concealed pistol or revolver.

The licensing authorities of any city or town shall, upon application of any person twenty-one (21) years of age or over having a bona fide residence or place of business within the city or town, or of any person twenty-one (21) years of age or over having a bona fide residence within the United States and a license or permit to carry a pistol or revolver concealed upon his or her person issued by the authorities of any other state or subdivision of the United States, issue a license or permit to the person to carry concealed upon his or her person a pistol or revolver everywhere within this state for four (4) years from date of issue, if it appears that the applicant has good reason to fear an injury to his or her person or property or has any other proper reason for carrying a pistol or revolver, and that he or she is a suitable person to be so licensed. The license or permit shall be in triplicate in form to be prescribed by the attorney general and shall bear the fingerprint, photograph, name, address, description, and signature of the licensee and the reason given for desiring a license or permit and in no case shall it contain the serial number of any firearm. The original shall be delivered to the licensee. Any member of the licensing authority, its agents, servants, and employees shall be immune from suit in any action, civil or criminal, based upon any official act or decision, performed or made in good faith in issuing a license or permit under this chapter.

Notwithstanding any other chapter or section of the general laws of the state of Rhode Island, the licensing authority of any city or town shall not provide or release to any individual, firm, association or corporation the name, address, or date of birth of any person who has held or currently holds a license or permit to carry a concealed pistol or revolver. This section shall not be construed to prohibit the release of any statistical data of a general nature relative to age, gender and racial or ethnic background nor shall it be construed to prevent the release of information to parties involved in any prosecution of §

11-47-8

or in response to a lawful subpoena in any criminal or civil action which the person is a party to that action.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 1052, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 404, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-8

; G.L., §

11-47-11

, as enacted by P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 270, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 414, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 268, § 1.

11-47-12.
License or permit fee.

A fee of forty dollars ($40.00) shall be charged and shall be paid for each license or permit to the licensing authority issuing it. Every license or permit shall be valid for four (4) years from the date when issued unless sooner revoked. The fee charged for issuing of the license or permit shall be applied for the use and benefit of the city, town, or state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 1052, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 404, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-9

; G.L., §

11-47-12

, as enacted by P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 426, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 342, § 1.

11-47-13.
Revocation of license or permit.

Any license or permit may be revoked for just cause at any time by the authority granting it, and, upon revocation, the authority shall give immediate notice to the attorney general, who shall immediately note the revocation, with the date of revocation, upon the copy of the license or permit on file in his or her office.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 1052, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 404, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-10

; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-13

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 278, § 1.

11-47-14.
Licenses and permits to banks and carriers.

The attorney general may issue a license or permit to any banking institution doing business in this state or to any public carrier who is in the business of transporting mail, money, securities, or other valuables, to possess and use machine guns under any regulations that the attorney general may prescribe.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 1052, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 404, § 7; P.L. 1941, ch. 991, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-11

; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-14

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 278, § 1.

11-47-15.
Proof of ability required for license or permit.

No person shall be issued a license or permit to carry a pistol or revolver concealed upon his or her person until he or she has presented certification as prescribed in §

11-47-16

that he or she has qualified with a pistol or revolver of a caliber equal to or larger than the one he or she intends to carry, that qualification to consist of firing a score of one hundred ninety-five (195) or better out of a possible score of three hundred (300) with thirty (30) consecutive rounds at a distance of twenty-five (25) yards on the army “L” target, firing “slow” fire. The “slow” fire course shall allow ten (10) minutes for the firing of each of three (3) ten (10) shot strings.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 278, § 1.

11-47-15.1.
Qualifications required of law enforcement officers appointed after June 6, 1970.

Except as provided in §

11-47-15.3

, all law enforcement officers of this state and its political subdivisions whose permanent appointment shall take place later than June 6, 1970, shall qualify on the official National Rifle Association B-21 police combat target firing a score of one hundred sixty-five (165) or better out of a possible score of two hundred fifty (250) with fifty (50) rounds in the distance, time period, and position required in the course:

Stage A: Seven (7) yards, ten (10) shots crouch position, time twenty-five (25) seconds.

Stage B: twelve (12) yards, five (5) shots point shoulder left hand, five (5) shots point shoulder right hand, both unsupported, and five (5) shots kneeling, time seventy-five (75) seconds.

Stage C: twenty-one (21) yards, five (5) shots point shoulder left hand supported, five (5) shots point shoulder right hand supported, time forty-five (45) seconds.

Stage D: twenty-five (25) yards, five (5) shots prone, five (5) shots left hand barricade, five (5) shots right hand barricade, time one minute forty-five (1:45) seconds.

All stages are started with the weapon loaded with 5 rounds and holstered.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 282, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 364, § 2.

11-47-15.2.
Definitions of law enforcement firing positions.

“Barricade” means standing on both feet drawing the weapon and using the free hand to support it, with the use of the barricade.

“Crouch position” means exerted effort to reduce the size of the body, weapon may be fired with one or two hands, the shooter may not drop to his or her knee(s).

“Kneeling” means kneeling on one knee, the other extended towards the target. One arm may be supported on the forward knee. The weapon may be fired with either hand and may be supported by the free hand.

“Point shoulder” means a semi-crouch position with weapon held at shoulder level.

“Prone” means body extended on the ground, head towards the target. The weapon may be supported by both hands which are extended towards the target. The shooter shall assume this position by dropping to his or her knees. Weapon shall be drawn while in kneeling position, free hand shall be extended forward to support shooter as he or she continues into the prone position.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 282, § 1.

11-47-15.3.
Commission on law enforcement standards and training.

In lieu of the provisions of §§

11-47-15.1

,

11-47-15.2

and

11-47-17

, each law enforcement department of this state and its political subdivisions may, on an annual basis, submit to the commission on law enforcement standards and training, referred to in this section as the “commission”, a proposal for the training and qualification of their officers on all firearms which they are authorized to carry or use in the performance of their official duties.

Each proposal shall include training and qualification in the following areas:

Decision shooting;

Reduced light shooting;

Moving targets;

Use of cover;

Non-dominate hand shooting;

Alternate position shooting;

Reloading drills;

Malfunction drills.

A minimum number of one hundred (100) rounds shall be fired by each officer during the training and qualification.

Qualification shall be no less than twenty percent (20%) nor more than fifty percent (50%) of the total rounds fired. A minimum qualifying score shall be sixty-six percent (66%) of the rounds fired during the qualification phase.

The commission shall review each proposal and, within fourteen (14) days, notify the department, in writing, whether the proposal is accepted or rejected. In the case of rejection, the commission shall make recommendations to the department which, if implemented, would make the proposal acceptable. Upon receipt of this notification, the department shall have fourteen (14) days to submit a new proposal that is acceptable to the commission.

In the event that a department neglects to submit a proposal to the commission or fails to submit a proposal that is approved by the commission, the officers of that department shall be required to fulfill the requirements for qualification as set out in §

11-47-15.1

,

11-47-15.2

,

11-47-17

or

11-47-17.1

.

All law enforcement officers of this state and its political subdivisions whose permanent appointment shall take place after July 1, 1997, will be required to qualify under the provisions of this section with all weapons which they are authorized to carry or use in the execution of their official duties.

Any law enforcement officer of this state and its political subdivisions whose permanent appointment took place prior to July 1, 1997, may elect to qualify under the applicable provisions of §

11-47-15.1

,

11-47-15.2

,

11-47-17

or

11-47-17.1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 364, § 1.

11-47-16.
Certification of qualification.

The range officer of the Rhode Island state police, the range officer of any city or town police department maintaining a regular and continuing firearms training program, a pistol instructor certified by the National Rifle Association and/or the United States Revolver Association, and any other qualified persons that the attorney general may designate are authorized to certify the qualification required by §§

11-47-15

and

11-47-15

.1. The certification required by §§ 11-47-15,

11-47-15.1

and §

11-47-15.3

shall be accomplished on a form to be prescribed by the attorney general.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 282, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 364, § 2.

11-47-16.1.
Special commission on law enforcement weapons qualifications of retired officers.

There is hereby created a special commission to be known as the “Law Enforcement Weapons Qualifications of Retired Officers Commission.”

The purpose and charge of said commission shall be to study all aspects of firearms qualifications, standards, and certifications for all retired law enforcement officers appointed after June 17, 1959, from each of the city and town police departments of this state.

The commission shall consist of eight (8) members: one of whom shall be the president of the State Fraternal Order of Police, or designee; one of whom shall be the president of the Providence Fraternal Order of Police, Lodge No. 3, or designee; one of whom shall be the superintendent of the Rhode Island state police, or designee; one of whom shall be a representative of a local branch of the International Brotherhood of Police Officers, to be appointed by the national president of the IBPO; one of whom shall be the executive director of the New England Police Chiefs Association, or designee; one of whom shall be the chairman of the Rhode Island commission on law enforcement standards and training, or designee; one of whom shall be the Rhode Island attorney general, or designee; and one of whom shall the president of the Rhode Island State Rifle and Revolver Association or designee.

Vacancies in said commission shall be filled in like manner as the original appointment.

The membership of said commission shall receive no compensation for their services.

All departments and agencies of the state shall furnish such advice and information, documentary and otherwise, to said commission and its agents as is deemed necessary or desirable by the commission to facilitate the purposes of this resolution.

The commission shall report its findings and recommendations to the general assembly annually, on or before January 2, commencing in 2009.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 368, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 383, § 1.

11-47-17.
Qualifications required of law enforcement officers appointed after June 17, 1959.

Except as provided in §

11-47-15

.3, all law enforcement officers of this state and its political subdivisions whose permanent appointment shall take place after June 17, 1959, will be required to qualify with the pistol or revolver with which they are armed prior to their permanent appointment, that qualification to be the same as that required in §

11-47-15

. Town constables or police constables, special officers, and all law enforcement officers, who by law are authorized to carry side arms and whose appointments are made on a recurring basis, will be required to qualify not later than one year following the date of enactment of this section and their commissions or warrants will be plainly marked or stamped “QUALIFIED WITH PISTOL OR REVOLVER” and will be signed and dated by the certifying authority attesting to that fact. The failure of any law enforcement officer to qualify under the provisions of this section revokes his or her privilege of carrying a pistol or revolver, whether concealed or not, on or about his or her person. All law enforcement officers of this state and its political subdivisions will repeat this qualification at periods of not more than one year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 364, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 3, § 15; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 18; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 18; P.L. 2022, ch. 212, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 213, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

11-47-17.1.
Mandatory or discretionary nature of § 11-47-15.1 requirements — Qualification reports to be filed.

All law enforcement officers of this state and its political subdivisions, whose permanent appointment shall take place later than June 6, 1970, shall be required to qualify with the pistol or revolver with which they are armed prior to their permanent appointment, that qualification to be as required in §§

11-47-15.1

and

11-47-15

.3. All permanent appointed law enforcement officers of this state and its political subdivisions who are required to qualify under §

11-47-17

may, at the discretion of the officer, qualify under either §

11-47-15

, §

11-47-15.1

, or §

11-47-15.3

. The failure of any law enforcement officer to qualify under the provisions of this section revokes his or her privilege of carrying a pistol or revolver, whether concealed or not, on or about his or her person. Qualification under this section will be required at periods of not more than one year.

Copies of all of the qualification reports shall be filed with the office of the attorney general.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 282, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 279, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 364, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 3, § 15; P.L. 2022, ch. 212, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 213, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

11-47-18.
License or permit issued by attorney general on showing of need — Issuance to retired police officers.

The attorney general may issue a license or permit to any person twenty-one (21) years of age or over to carry a pistol or revolver, whether concealed or not, upon his or her person upon a proper showing of need, subject to the provisions of §§

11-47-12

and

11-47-15

; that license or permit may be issued notwithstanding the provisions of §

11-47-7

.

All state police officers and permanent members of city and town police forces of this state who have retired in good standing after at least twenty (20) years of service, or retired in good standing due to a physical disability other than a psychological impairment, may be issued a license or permit by the attorney general subject to the provisions of §§

11-47-12

and

11-47-15

. The term “in good standing” means that at the time of retirement, the police officer was not facing disciplinary action that could have resulted in his or her termination for misconduct or unfitness for office. Any member of the licensing authority, and its agents, servants, and employees shall be immune from suit in any action, civil or criminal, based upon any official act or decision, performed or made in good faith in issuing a license or permit under this chapter.

Notwithstanding any other chapter or section of the general laws of the state of Rhode Island, the attorney general shall not provide or release to any individual, firm, association or corporation the name, address, or date of birth of any person who has held or currently holds a license or permit to carry a concealed pistol or revolver. This section shall not be construed to prohibit the release of any statistical data of a general nature relative to age, gender and racial or ethnic background nor shall it be construed to prevent the release of information to parties involved in any prosecution of §

11-47-8

or in response to a lawful subpoena in any criminal or civil action which said person is a party to such action.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 404, § 7; P.L. 1950, ch. 2452, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-13

; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-18

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 387, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 396, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 414, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 268, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 368, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 438, § 1.

11-47-19.
Machine gun manufacturers’ licenses or permits.

The attorney general may issue to any person, firm, or corporation, engaged in manufacturing in this state, a license or permit to manufacture and sell machine guns and any or all machine gun parts under any regulations that the attorney general may prescribe.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 404, § 7; P.L. 1941, ch. 991, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-12

; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-19

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 278, § 1.

11-47-20.
Sale or possession of silencers.

It shall be unlawful within this state to manufacture, sell, purchase, or possess any muffler, silencer, or device for deadening or muffling the sound of a firearm when discharged. Violations of this section shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one year and one day.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 1052, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 404, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-14

; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-20

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1.

11-47-20.1.
Armor-piercing bullets.

It shall be unlawful within this state for any person to import, manufacture, sell, purchase, or otherwise transfer any bullets which have steel inner cores or cores of equivalent hardness and truncated cones and which are designed for use in pistols as armor-piercing or metal-piercing bullets. Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than three (3) years, or a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both. This section shall not apply to the purchase of those bullets by the Rhode Island state police, by any city or town police department of the state of Rhode Island, or by the department of environmental management for display as a part of a firearms training course under its auspices.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 218, § 1.

11-47-20.2.
Possession during commission of a felony.

Any person who uses bullets referred to in §

11-47-20.1

in the commission of a felony or who carries bullets of that kind in any weapon during the commission of a felony shall, in addition to the punishment provided for the commission of the felony, be punished by imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than ten (10) years, or a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 218, § 1.

11-47-20.3.
Injury or death of law enforcement officer.

Any person who uses bullets as defined in §

11-47-20.1

in the shooting of any law enforcement officer acting in the performance of his or her official duties so as to cause injury or death to the officer shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to life imprisonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 462, § 1.

11-47-20.4.
Body armor.

It shall be unlawful within this state for any person to purchase, own or possess body armor, if that person has been convicted of a felony that is a crime of violence. It shall be an affirmative defense under this section that the defendant obtained prior written certification from his or her employer that the defendant’s purchase, use or possession of body armor was necessary for the safe performance of lawful business activity. It shall also be an affirmative defense for a confidential informant or witness with a conviction for a crime of violence to possess body armor when that person is engaged by a law enforcement agency, for a legitimate law enforcement purpose, and is under the direct supervision and acting under the direct authorization of the colonel or chief of police of that law enforcement agency. Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than three (3) years, or a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

Definitions. For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

“Crime of violence” means murder, manslaughter, first degree arson, kidnapping with intent to extort, robbery, larceny from the person, first degree sexual assault, second degree sexual assault, first and second degree child molestation, assault with intent to murder, assault with intent to rob, assault with intent to commit first degree sexual assault, burglary, and entering a dwelling house with intent to commit murder, robbery, sexual assault, or larceny.

“Body armor” means any product sold or offered for sale, in interstate or foreign commerce, as personal protective body covering intended to protect against gunfire, regardless of whether the product is to be worn alone or is sold as a complement to another product or garment.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 135, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 144, § 1.

11-47-21.
Restrictions on possession or carrying of explosives or noxious substances.

Any person, except a member of the state police, division of sheriffs, a member of the police force of any city or town, or a member of the Army, Navy, Air Force, or Marine Corps of the United States, or of the National Guard or organized reserves when on duty, who possesses, or carries on or about his or her person or in a vehicle, a bomb or bombshell, except for blasting or other commercial use, or who, with intent to use it unlawfully against the person or property of another, possesses or carries any explosive substance, or any noxious liquid, gas, or substance, shall be guilty of a violation of this chapter and punished as provided in §

11-47-26

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 1052, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 404, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-15

; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-21

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 134, § 6; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 41.

11-47-22.
Forfeiture and destruction of unlawful firearms.

No property right shall exist in any firearm unlawfully possessed, carried, or used, and all unlawful firearms are hereby declared to be nuisances and forfeited to the state.

When a firearm is lawfully seized, confiscated from or turned in by any person, it shall be placed in the custody of the superintendent of state police or the chief of police in the city or town in which it was seized, confiscated or turned in to. The officer who takes custody of the firearm shall promptly ascertain, using available record keeping systems, including, but not limited to, the National Crime Information Center, whether the firearm has been reported stolen and if stolen shall notify the reporting law enforcement agency of the recovery of said firearm. If the police department in the city or town in which the firearm was seized or confiscated has not been notified by a justice of the superior court or the attorney general that the firearm is necessary as evidence in a criminal or civil matter, it shall be returned to the lawful owner. However, any owner of a firearm who shall knowingly fail to report the loss or theft of the firearm to the proper law enforcement authorities shall not be entitled to its return.

If a firearm is found not to be stolen and the owner cannot be readily ascertained within ninety (90) days subsequent to the seizure or confiscation of said firearm and the firearm is no longer necessary as evidence in a criminal or civil matter, the police department having custody of the firearm shall have the option of either: (1) destroying said firearm by rendering it permanently and irretrievably inoperable; (2) transferring custody of said firearms to the state crime laboratory for the purpose of criminal investigation; or (3) holding an auction of those firearms seized, confiscated or turned in to said police department; provided, however, any firearms to be transferred at auction shall be limited to antique firearms or curios or relics. For purposes of this section, “an antique firearm” shall be defined as any firearm (including any firearm with a matchlock, flintlock, percussion cap, or similar type of ignition system) manufactured on or before 1899, and any replica of such firearm if such replica is not designed or redesigned for using rim-fire or conventional center fire fixed ammunition, or uses rim-fire or conventional center fire fixed ammunition which is no longer manufactured in the United States and which is not readily available in the ordinary channels of commercial trade. “Curios or relics” shall be defined as firearms which are of special interest to collectors by reason of some quality other than is associated with firearms intended for sporting use or as offensive or defensive weapons. To be recognized as curios or relics, firearms must be manufactured at least fifty (50) years prior to the current date, but not including replicas thereof, and firearms which derive a substantial part of their monetary value from the fact that they are novel, rare, bizarre, or because of their association with some historical figure, period, or event.

In the event that an auction is held, bidders shall be limited to bona fide holders of a valid Federal Firearms License for Retail Sale or a Federal Firearms Collector License. Any auction shall be advertised at least once a week for a period of three (3) weeks preceding the date of the auction in a newspaper of general circulation, said notice clearly stating the time, location and terms of said auction. All funds realized shall be used to purchase and provide necessary safety equipment, including, but not limited to, bulletproof vests, for the police department holding the auction and shall not revert to any general fund of the state, city or town, as the case may be.

All firearms received by any police department in any manner shall be entered in the department’s permanent records and listed by make, model, caliber and serial number and the manner in which said firearm was disposed of and, if by auction, the name and federal license number of the buyer. A copy of said record shall be forwarded to the office of the Rhode Island Attorney General and the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco and Firearms of the United States Treasury Department on at least an annual basis.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 1052, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 404, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-16

; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-22

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 418, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 432, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 267, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 417, § 1.

11-47-23.
False information in securing firearm or license — Straw purchases.

No person shall, in purchasing or otherwise securing delivery of a shotgun, rifle, pistol, or revolver, or in applying for a license or permit to carry it, give false information or offer false evidence of his or her identity.

No person shall knowingly purchase or otherwise obtain a shotgun, rifle, pistol, or revolver on behalf of another person, or transfer a shotgun, rifle, pistol, or revolver to another person, whom the transferor knows or reasonably should know is prohibited from possessing a firearm under federal or state law.

A first violation of the provisions of this section may be punished by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or both. A second or subsequent violation of the provisions of this section may be punished by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 1025, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 404, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-17

; G.L., §

11-47-23

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 37, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 300, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 455, § 3; P.L. 2013, ch. 464, § 3; P.L. 2021, ch. 339, § 1, effective July 12, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 340, § 1, effective July 12, 2021.

11-47-24.
Alteration of marks of identification on firearms.

No person shall change, alter, remove, or obliterate the name of the maker, model, manufacturer’s number, or if there is no name of the maker, model, or manufacturer’s number then any other mark of identification on any firearm.

No person shall, absent recertification paperwork, knowingly receive, transport, or possess any firearm which has had the name of the maker or manufacturer’s serial number removed, altered, or obliterated, or if there is no name of the maker, model, or manufacturer’s number then any other mark of identification on any firearm.

Possession of any firearm, absent recertification paperwork, upon which the name of the maker, model, manufacturer’s number, or if there is no name of the maker, model, or manufacturer’s number then any other mark of identification on any firearm has been changed, altered, removed, or obliterated shall be prima facie evidence that the possessor has changed, altered, removed, or obliterated.

A person in possession of a firearm, with proof of ownership and/or transfer from a FFL dealer, may apply for recertification of that firearm from a Rhode Island based licensed firearms business owner who also is an FFL dealer or a local police chief and/or police department official if the name of the maker, model, manufacturer’s number, or if there is no name of the maker, model, or manufacturer’s number then any other mark of identification on the firearm has been only partially damaged.

The Rhode Island based licensed firearms business owner who is also an FFL dealer or a local police chief and/or police department official shall, within sixty (60) days of the application if he or she is reasonably able to verify the firearm ownership and identifying marks recertify the firearm or return the firearm to the person who presented it, certify by written notarized documentation that the firearm’s name of the maker, model, manufacturer’s number, or if there is no name of the maker, model, or manufacturer’s number then any other mark of identification on the firearm has been partially damaged and is still identifiable and traceable to the record owner.

The sale or transfer of a recertified firearm and/or the submission of a report by the record owner that the firearm was stolen immediately voids all recertification documentation.

Violation of the provisions of this section may be punished by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years.

This section shall not apply to the lawful exchange of component parts of any firearms, nor to any antique and collectible weapons legally possessed by collectors and dealers of firearms as provided in §

11-47-25

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 1052, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 404, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-18

; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-24

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 454, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 481, § 1.

11-47-25.
Antique firearms and collections.

This chapter shall not apply to antique firearms unsuitable for use, nor to collections of firearms utilized and maintained for educational, scientific, or any similar purpose without intent to use the firearms.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 1052, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 404, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-19

; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-25

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 278, § 1.